Delaware, session 153, SB257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Three-fifths of all members elected to each house thereof concurring therein): Section 1. Amend Subchapter I, Chapter 30F, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows and by redesignating Delaware Code provisions accordingly: Â§ 3001F. 3000F. Definitions. For purposes of this subchapter: (1) âAnimal rescue organizationâ means an animal welfare society or other non-profit organization that accepts custody of animals for the purpose of finding permanent adoptive homes for the animals and uses a network of foster homes to maintain the animals. An âanimal rescue organizationâ does not do any of the following: a. Maintain a facility or physical structure for housing animals until final disposition. b. Breed animals. c. Obtain animals in exchange for payment or compensation from any person that breeds or brokers the animals. (1) (2) âAnimal shelterâ means a public or private facility which includes facility that includes a physical structure that structure and which provides temporary or permanent shelter to stray, abandoned, abused, or owner-surrendered animals cats or dogs, and that is operated, owned, or maintained by a duly incorporated humane society, animal welfare society, or other nonprofit organization for the purpose of providing for and promoting the welfare, protection, and humane treatment of animals. In addition to sheltering cats or dogs, the facility may also shelter other species. âAnimal shelterâ shall does not include individuals providing temporary foster care to animals in their home or to animal rescue groups sheltering animals on an individualâs private property. home or an animal rescue organization. (6) âFoster homeâ means the temporary shelter for an animal provided by an individual in that individualâs home while the animal is in the custody of the animal rescue organization or animal shelter. (6) (8) âIntakeâ means the number of live animals for which an animal shelter assumes custody and are admitted for temporary shelter and care. Intake âIntakeâ includes all animals admitted to the shelter, a foster care, home, or a satellite location. (12) âPersonâ means corporations, companies, associations, firms, partnerships, societies, and joint-stock companies, this State, a county or a municipality of this State, as well as individuals. Section 2. Amend Subchapter I, Chapter 30F, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3001F. License required. (a) A person may not operate an animal shelter in this State without doing both of the following: (1) Obtaining a license from the Department. (2) Renewing the license annually. (b)(1) Each branch of an animal shelter must be separately licensed, even if the branches are operated by the same person. (2) Licenses are not transferable to another branch or person. (c)(1) An application for a license and license renewal must be submitted in the form and manner required by the Department. (2) The Department may charge an animal shelter a reasonable license fee and license renewal fee that may not exceed the costs to the Department of administering this subchapter. (d) An animal shelter must undergo an inspection before an initial license is issued to ensure that animal shelterâs ability to comply with this subchapter and applicable regulations. (e)(1) Subject to subsection (f) of this section, the Department shall renew a personâs license if that person complies with subsection (c) of this section by filing an application to renew the license and paying any required license renewal fee. (2) The Department has discretion to issue an animal shelter a provisional license when requirements for license renewal are not met under subsection (f) of this section if the required license renewal fee has been paid. (f) The Department may refuse to issue or renew, or may suspend or revoke a license, if the person does any of the following: (1) In any jurisdiction that requires licensure, operates an animal shelter without a license or under a revoked or suspended license. (2) Fails to meet the requirements of this subchapter or any applicable regulation . (3) Knowingly, or with reason to know, makes a false statement of a material fact in, or falsifies, any of the following: a. An application for a license or a license renewal. b. Any data or document submitted to the Department. c. Records required to be kept under this subchapter or under applicable regulation. (4) Refuses to allow representatives or agents of the Department to inspect any of the following: a. All or any portion of the animal shelter. b. Any documents, records, or files required to be maintained by the animal shelter. (5) Does not correct a previously identified violation. (6) Has unpaid fees or fines. (7) Has a history of noncompliance with animal welfare laws or applicable regulations. (g) Failure to comply with subsection (a) of this section may result in the imposition by the Department of a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 per violation. Each day that the animal shelter continues to operate an animal shelter without a license is another violation. The Department may issue a warning for the first violation. (h) A person must be given notice and the opportunity to be heard in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act, Chapter 101 of Title 29 before the Department may do either of the following: (1) Revoke, suspend, or deny a license or license renewal. (2) Issue a civil penalty under subsection (g) of this section. Section 3. Amend Â§ 3003F, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3003F. Animal adoption, recovery, and rehabilitation. (b) Animal shelters shall provide a minimum holding period of 3 business days for animals in their care, to allow reclamation by their owners. If an adoptable animal is not reclaimed, the animal may be transferred to another animal shelter or animal rescue organization for adoption, or adopted as a companion in a suitable home. The holding period required by this subsection shall not does not apply to owner-surrendered animals, other cases in which the owner of the animal is known, or to cats that are returned to field as part of a free-roaming cat program. (d) Animal shelters shall establish and maintain a registry of organizations willing to accept animals for the purpose of adoption, including breed specific rescues, breed-specific animal rescue organizations, or to provide the animals with long-term placements. The registry shall must include the types and breeds of animals about which the organization wishes to be contacted. Animal shelters shall have the right to inspect the facilities of any adoption organization taking animals from the shelter. Section 4. Amend Â§ 3004F, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3004F. Euthanasia in animal shelters. (a) Any dog, cat cat, or other animal held by or in the custody of an animal shelter and not adopted, transferred to another shelter or animal rescue group, animal rescue organization, placed into a free-roaming cat program, or reclaimed by the owner within 5 days may be euthanized, provided that no reasonable alternatives are available and the requirements of subsections (b) and (c) of this section are met. Section 5. Amend Â§ 3013F, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3013F. Definitions. As used in this subchapter: (1) âAnimal shelterâ means a public or private facility which includes a physical structure that provides temporary or permanent shelter to stray, abandoned, abused, or owner-surrendered animals. as defined in Â§ 3000F of this title. Section 6. Amend Â§ 3041F, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3041F. Definitions. As used in this subchapter: (1) âAnimal shelterâ means a public or private facility which includes a physical structure that provides temporary or permanent shelter to stray, abandoned, abused, or owner-surrendered animals and is operated, owned, or maintained by an incorporated humane society, animal welfare society, or other nonprofit organization for the purpose of providing for and promoting the welfare, protection, and humane treatment of animals. âAnimal shelterâ does not mean individuals providing temporary foster care to animals in their home or animal rescue groups sheltering animals on an individualâs private property. as defined in Â§ 3000F of this title. Section 7. Amend Â§ 3091F, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 3091F. Definitions. For purposes of this subchapter: (2) âAnimal shelterâ means as defined in Â§ 3001F 3000F of this title. Section 8. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027. Section 9. The initial inspection requirement in Â§ 3001F(d), contained in Section 2 of this Act, is not applicable to an animal shelter that has been operating in this State before January 1, 2027, so long as that animal shelter has had a satisfactory inspection under Â§ 3008F(b) of Title 16 within the year preceding January 1, 2027.